Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 1. General Duties of Towns

§ 901.
Removal of roadside growth.

Except for work that is part of the Transportation Program under section 10g of this title:

A person shall not remove shade trees, as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 2501a

, without prior approval of the tree warden pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 67.

A person, other than the abutting landowner or municipality, shall not cut, trim, remove, or otherwise damage any grasses, shrubs, vines, or trees growing within the limits of a town highway without first obtaining the consent of the legislative body.

A person, other than the Agency or the abutting landowner, shall not cut, trim, remove, or otherwise damage any grasses, shrubs, vines, or trees growing within the limits of lands subject to any ownership interest held by the Agency without first obtaining the Agency’s written consent.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Nov. 1, 2020;

2021, No. 20

, § 99.

§ 902.
Penalty for removal.

A person, other than the Agency, the abutting landowner, the municipality, or the tree warden, who willfully or maliciously cuts, trims, removes, or otherwise damages trees within the limits of a State highway or municipal right-of-way shall be fined pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 3602

, unless the person has obtained prior written consent from the Agency, municipality, or tree warden.

A person, other than the Agency, the abutting landowner, the municipality, or the tree warden, who willfully or maliciously cuts, trims, removes, or otherwise damages grasses, shrubs, or vines within highway limits in violation of section 901 of this title shall be fined not more than $100.00 nor less than $10.00, for each offense, unless the person has obtained prior written consent from the Agency or municipality.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Nov. 1, 2020.

§ 903.
Agreements for planting.

The Agency or the selectboard may enter into agreements with individuals or organizations who wish to plant grasses, shrubs, vines, trees, or flowers within highway limits.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 904.
Tree and brush removal.

The legislative body of a municipality, if necessary, shall cause to be cut and burned, or removed from within the limits of the highways under its care, trees and bushes that obstruct the view of the highway ahead or that cause damage to the highway or that are objectionable from a material or scenic standpoint. Trees that have been set out or marked by the abutting landowners and shade trees that have been designated pursuant to 24 V.S.A. chapter 67 shall be preserved if the usefulness or safety of the highway is not impaired. Young trees standing at a proper distance from the roadbed and from each other, and banks and hedges of bushes that serve as a protection to the highway or add beauty to the roadside, shall be preserved. On State highways, the Secretary shall have the same authority as the legislative body.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2019, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Nov. 1, 2020.

§ 905.
Construction of sidewalks, bicycle paths, and footpaths.

The legislative body of a municipality may construct and maintain suitable footpaths, bicycle paths, or sidewalks, or any combination of these, within the limits of town highways where they do not conflict with travel on the highway. Permission may be granted by the Agency for the construction and maintenance of these facilities on State highways.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 61

, § 14, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 905a.
Curb cuts and ramps.

All newly constructed intersections or curbs in the State used by pedestrians shall be constructed with curb cuts or ramps that enable persons with ambulatory disabilities to have access to the sidewalk. Specifications for design of curb cuts or ramps shall be in accordance with the American National Standards Institute. All curb cuts or ramps in the State shall be of a uniform design where practical.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 118.

§ 905b.
Crosswalks.

All crosswalk markings shall be of uniform color, dimension, and location and be in conformance with the U.S. Department of Transportation Federal Highway Administrations’ Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2003, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 905c.
Audible traffic signals.

Audible warning signals shall be installed at all intersections with an exclusive walk cycle where new traffic light systems are installed.
As used in this section, “audible” means a signal that is sufficiently loud as to be heard when the traffic conditions in a particular location are considered.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 906.
Penalties.

A person who willfully drives over or parks or otherwise impedes normal use on a sidewalk or footpath, except where it is necessary to cross the sidewalk for the purpose of entering private grounds, shall be fined not more than $25.00 nor less than $5.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 100.